Utah statutes.
64-13-21.   Supervision of sentenced offenders placed in community --
Rulemaking -- POST certified parole or probation officers and peace officers
-- Duties -- Supervision fee.
(1) (a)  The department, except as otherwise provided by law, shall supervise
sentenced offenders placed in the community on probation by the courts, on
parole by the Board of Pardons and Parole, or upon acceptance for supervision
under the terms of the Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Parolees and
Probationers.
(b)  Standards for the supervision of offenders shall be established by the
department in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act, giving priority, based on available resources, to felony
offenders.
(2)  Employees of the department who are POST certified as law enforcement
officers or correctional officers and who are designated as parole and
probation officers by the executive director have the following duties:
(a)  monitoring, investigating, and supervising a parolee's or probationer's
compliance with the conditions of the parole or probation agreement;
(b)  investigating or apprehending any offender who has escaped from the
custody of the department or absconded from supervision;
(c)  providing investigative services for the courts, the department, or the
Board of Pardons and Parole;
(d)  supervising any offender during transportation; or
(e)  collecting DNA specimens when the specimens are required under Section
53-10-404.
(3) (a)  A monthly supervision fee of $30 shall be collected from each
offender on probation or parole.  The fee may be suspended or waived by the
department upon a showing by the offender that imposition would create a
substantial hardship or if the offender owes restitution to a victim.
(b) (i)  The department shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter
3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, specifying the criteria for suspension
or waiver of the supervision fee and the circumstances under which an offender
may request a hearing.
(ii)  In determining whether the imposition of the supervision fee would
constitute a substantial hardship, the department shall consider the financial
resources of the offender and the burden that the fee would impose, with
regard to the offender's other obligations.
